Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1235
Communication between courts.

(a) A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

(b) The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. If the parties are not able to participate in the communication, they shall be given the opportunity to present facts and legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction is made.

(c) Communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and similar matters may occur without informing the parties. A record need not be made of the communication.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a record shall be made of a communication under this section. The parties shall be informed promptly of the communication and granted access to the record.

(e) For the purposes of this section, record means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 10.

This section does not require a verbatim transcription of the consultation between two courts after a hearing; rather, a sufficient record of the courts' posthearing consultation is made when the courts enter orders memorializing the substance of their communication. Kee v. Gilbert, 32 Neb. App. 1, 992 N.W.2d 486 (2023).